Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXXV Domestic Relations
Registration of Foreign Support Order

407.450.
Register of foreign support order. [Repealed.]

407.460.
Circuit clerk to maintain registry. [Repealed.]

407.470.
County attorney to represent obligee — Registration procedure — Confirmation after notice. [Repealed.]

407.480.
Effect of registration. [Repealed.]